Georgia, session 2025_26, HB770.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act creating the Gwinnett Judicial Circuit and providing for its powers, duties,
jurisdiction, and officers, approved February 12, 1960 (Ga. L. 1960, p. 110), as amended, is
amended by adding a new section to read as follows:
"SECTION 2A.1.
The governing authority of Gwinnett County shall provide from county funds supplements
to the compensation received from state funds for the chief judge of the superior court in
the amount of $10,000.00 per year, to be paid in 12 equal monthly payments. The
H. B. 770
- 1 -

LC 47 3528/AP
supplement provided by this section shall be in addition to any other county supplements
provided to each judge of the superior court."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on June 1, 2025.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 770
- 2 -